New York, session 2025-2026, A2482.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is 2 amended by adding a new section 13.22 to read as follows: 3 § 13.22 Annual vehicular access for active volunteer firefighters and 4 active volunteer ambulance workers. 1. Notwithstanding any other law, 5 rule or regulation to the contrary, the office or other state agency 6 having jurisdiction of a state park or recreational facility which has 7 the authority to issue an annual pass for vehicular access pursuant to 8 this article shall issue such annual pass for vehicular access without 9 charge to an active volunteer firefighter or an active volunteer ambu- 10 lance worker, who received service credit the prior year pursuant to a 11 service award program established pursuant to section two hundred 12 sixteen-a or two hundred nineteen-d of the general municipal law, and 13 their immediate family at any state park or recreational facility upon 14 proof of such active volunteer firefighter service or active volunteer 15 ambulance worker. 16 2. For the purposes of this section: (a) "active volunteer firefight- 17 er" shall mean a resident of the state who is an active volunteer fire- 18 fighter as defined in subdivision one of section two hundred fifteen of 19 the general municipal law; (b) "active volunteer ambulance worker" shall 20 mean a resident of the state who is an active volunteer ambulance worker 21 as defined in subdivision nine-b of section two hundred nineteen-c of 22 the general municipal law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01462-01-5 A. 2482 2 1 3. The office or other state agency having jurisdiction shall promul- 2 gate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the 3 provisions of this section. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 5 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 6 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 7 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 8 completed on or before such effective date.